West Virginia, session 2025, HB3037.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1C. FAIR AND EQUITABLE PROPERTY VALUATION. §11-1C-9a. Fair and equitable assessment of real property. (a) The Legislature finds that unnecessary, unjustified -- and in some cases, random -- assessments of real property are unfair and unjust and should be unlawful. It is the intent of the Legislature to prevent such unjust and unfair assessments.(b) Notwithstanding any provision of this code to the contrary, it is unlawful to increase the assessed value of real property for no apparent reason than to establish a new or additional source of revenue.(c)  Notwithstanding any provision of this code to the contrary, no increase in the assessed value of property may be made unless it is made based upon a periodic review, evaluation and inspection of the property pursuant to the three-year cycle of inspection of the property made pursuant to §11-1C-9.  The reasons for increased assessments of real property must be justified and shall be announced and made available to the public.